Maryland, session 2026, SB0600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) (1) “Retail sale” means the sale of:
(i) tangible personal property;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0600*

SENATE BILL 600
(ii) a taxable service;
(iii) a digital code; or
(iv) a digital product.
(3) “Retail sale” does not include:
(i) a transfer of title to tangible personal property after its use as
facilities, tools, tooling, machinery, or equipment, including dies, molds, and patterns, if:
1. at the time of purchase, the buyer is obligated, under the
terms of a written contract, to make the transfer; and
2. the transfer is made for the same or greater consideration
to the person for whom the buyer manufactures goods or performs work;
(ii) a sale of tangible personal property, a digital code, or a digital
product if the buyer intends to:
1. resell the tangible personal property, digital code, or
digital product in the form that the buyer receives or is to receive the property, digital code,
or digital product;
2. use or incorporate the tangible personal property, digital
code, or digital product in a production activity as a material or part of other tangible
personal property or another digital product to be produced for sale; or
3. transfer the tangible personal property, digital code, or
digital product as a part of a taxable service transaction; [or]
(iii) a sale of a taxable service if the buyer intends to resell the taxable
service in the form that the buyer receives or is to receive the service; OR
(IV) A SALE OF A TAXABLE SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (M)(14) OR (15) OF THIS SECTION IF:
1. THE BUYER INTENDS TO USE OR INCORPORATE THE
TAXABLE SERVICE INTO ANOTHER TAXABLE SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (M)(14) OR (15) OF THIS SECTION FOR SALE; OR
2. BOTH THE VENDOR AND THE BUYER ARE MEMBERS OF
THE SAME AFFILIATED GROUP, AS DEFINED UNDER § 11–403 OF THIS TITLE, OR ARE
RELATED PASS–THROUGH ENTITIES, AS DEFINED UNDER § 11–403 OF THIS TITLE.
(m) “Taxable service” means:

SENATE BILL 600 3
(14) a data or information technology service described under NAICS Sector
518, 519, or 5415; or
(15) a system software or application software publishing service described
under NAICS Sector 5132.
11–102.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a tax is imposed on:
(1) a retail sale in the State; and
(2) a use, in the State, of tangible personal property, a digital code, a digital
product, or a taxable service.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.